Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-129] Mutiny or sedition. (a)
Any person subject to this chapter who:

(1) With intent to usurp or override lawful military
authority refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or
otherwise do the person's duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty
of mutiny;

(2) With intent to cause the overthrow or destruction
of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt,
violence, or other disturbance against that authority is guilty of sedition;

(3) Fails to do the person's utmost to prevent and
suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in the person's presence, or
fails to take all reasonable means to inform the person's superior commissioned
officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which the person knows or
has reason to believe is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or
report a mutiny or sedition.

(b) A person who is found guilty of attempted
mutiny, mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition
shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next